South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H4307.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: Lancaster County voting precincts SECTION 1.    Section 7-7-350 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 7-7-350.    (A) In Lancaster County there are the following voting precincts: 521 North Antioch Black Horse Run Buford Camp Creek Carmel Chesterfield Avenue College Park Douglas Elgin Erwin Farm Flat Creek Gold Hill Harrisburg Heath Springs Hyde Park Jim Wilson Kershaw McIlwain Osceola Pleasant Hill Pleasant Valley Possum Hollow Rich Hill River Road Riverside Six Mile Creek Springdale Sun City-Carolina Lakes Tradesville Unity Van Wyck (B) The precinct lines defining the above precincts are as shown on maps filed with the clerk of court of the county and also on file with the State Election Commission as provided and maintained by the Revenue and Fiscal Affairs Office designated as document P-57-25. (C) The polling places for the precincts provided in this section must be established by the Board of Voter Registration and Elections of Lancaster County subject to approval by a majority of the Lancaster County Legislative Delegation. Time effective SECTION 2.    This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. Ratified the 8th day of May, 2025. Approved the 12th day of May, 2025. __________